Wisconsin, session 2025, AB983.
do enact as follows:AB983,11Section 1. 84.09 (5) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB983,2,13284.09 (5) (c) 1. Subject to any prior action under s. 13.48 (14) (am) or 16.848 3(1), prior to conducting a public sale on a generally marketable surplus land parcel 4under par. (b), the department shall contact the county, municipality, and the local 5school district where the land parcel is located and the department of natural 6resources and, if the land parcel is located within or near a federally recognized 7Indian reservation or a bureau of Indian affairs service area, the federally 8recognized American Indian tribe or band associated with that reservation or 9service area to solicit interest in acquiring the parcel for public use. Upon 10notification from the department, the county, municipality, local school district, 11American Indian tribe or band, and department of natural resources must respond 12to the department, stating their interest in the land for public use, within 60 days. 13Failure to respond within 60 days constitutes noninterest in the land parcel.AB983,214Section 2. 84.09 (5) (c) 2. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB983,3,21584.09 (5) (c) 2. (intro.) Except as provided in subd. 2m. and subject to any prior 16action under s. 13.48 (14) (am) or 16.848 (1), if a county, a municipality, a local 17school district, or the department of natural resources or a federally recognized 18American Indian tribe or band in this state notified under subd. 1. expresses 19interest in acquiring the land for public use, the department shall offer the county, 1municipality, local school district, American Indian tribe or band, or department of 2natural resources the property at its appraised value if all of the following are true:AB983,33Section 3. 84.09 (5) (c) 2. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB983,3,7484.09 (5) (c) 2. a. The county, municipality, local school district, American 5Indian tribe or band, or department of natural resources provides a plan to the 6department identifying the proposed public use for the land parcel and the acreage 7involved in the public use.AB983,48Section 4. 84.09 (5) (c) 2m. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB983,3,15984.09 (5) (c) 2m. (intro.) If a county, municipality, or a local school district or 10a federally recognized American Indian tribe or band notified under subd. 1. 11expresses interest in acquiring the land for public use related to transportation or 12infrastructure, the department may, subject to any prior action under s. 13.48 (14) 13(am) or 16.848 (1), offer the county, municipality, American Indian tribe or band, or 14the local school district the property, for less than the appraised value of the 15property, if all of the following are true:AB983,516Section 5. 84.09 (5) (c) 2m. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB983,3,191784.09 (5) (c) 2m. a. The county, municipality, American Indian tribe or band, 18or local school district provides a plan to the department identifying the proposed 19use of the property for transportation or infrastructure purposes.AB983,620Section 6. 84.09 (5) (c) 2m. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB983,3,232184.09 (5) (c) 2m. b. The county, municipality, American Indian tribe or band, 22or local school district agrees to a permanent restriction on the use of the land for 23the purpose identified.AB983,71Section 7. 84.09 (5) (c) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB983,4,10284.09 (5) (c) 3. If the conditions of subd. 2. are met, the department shall 3transfer ownership of the land parcel to the county, municipality, local school 4district, American Indian tribe or band, or department of natural resources upon 5receipt of the appraised value of the land parcel. If the conditions of subd. 2m. are 6met, the department shall transfer ownership of the land parcel to the county, 7municipality, American Indian tribe or band, or local school district upon receipt of 8the agreed purchase price of the land parcel. Ownership of the land parcel shall be 9transferred contingent upon the public use identified under subd. 2., and shall 10remain in the ownership of the public entity preserving the public use.AB983,4,1111